California statutes. Civil Code
Any provision in a contract or agreement that prohibits a consumer from publishing or making statements about the business as a condition of receiving a partial or complete refund or any other consideration or thing of value is contrary to public policy and shall be void
 and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 89, Sec. 1.   (AB 1900)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Hotel and Private Residence Rental Reservation Refunds [1748.80. - 1748.84.]

1748.80.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Hosting platform” has the same meaning as defined in Section 22590 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) (1) “Hotel” means a hotel, motel, bed and breakfast inn, or other similar transient lodging establishment located in this state.

(2) “Hotel” does not include a residential hotel, as defined in Section 50519 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) “Third-party booking service” means a person that facilitates the booking of a hotel room or short-term rental in this state.

(d) “Short-term rental” means a residential dwelling, or any portion of a residential dwelling, that is rented to a person or persons for 30 or fewer consecutive days and that is located in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 718, Sec. 3.   (SB 644)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.81.

A hosting platform, hotel, third-party booking service, or short-term rental shall allow a reservation for a hotel accommodation or a short-term rental located in California to be canceled without penalty for at least 24 hours after the reservation is confirmed if the reservation is made 72 hours or more before the time of check-in.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 718, Sec. 3.   (SB 644)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.82.

(a) If a consumer cancels a reservation pursuant to Section 1748.81, the hosting platform, hotel, third-party booking service, or short-term rental shall issue a refund to a consumer of all amounts paid to the hosting platform, hotel, third-party booking service, or short-term rental to the original form of payment within 30 days of the cancellation of the reservation.

 (b) The refund required by this section shall include a refund of all fees charged to the consumer for optional services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 718, Sec. 3.   (SB 644)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.83.

(a) An action for a violation of this chapter may be brought only by any of the following:

(1) The Attorney General.

(2) A district attorney.

(3) A city attorney of a city having a population in excess of 750,000.

(4) A county counsel of any county within which a city has a population in excess of 750,000.

(5) With the consent of the district attorney, a city prosecutor in a city that has a full-time city prosecutor.

(b) In
 an action alleging a violation of this chapter, the court shall assess a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation. In determining the amount of the civil penalty, the court shall consider any of the relevant circumstances presented by any of the parties to the case, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The nature and seriousness of the misconduct.

(2) The number of violations.

(3) The persistence of the misconduct.

(4) The length of time over which the misconduct occurred.

(5) The willfulness of the misconduct.

(6) The defendant’s assets, liabilities, and net
 worth.

(c) Each day that a defendant remains in violation of this chapter shall constitute a single violation.

(d) The duties and obligations imposed by this chapter are cumulative with any other duties or obligations imposed under other law and shall not be construed to relieve any party from any duties or obligations imposed under other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 718, Sec. 3.   (SB 644)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.84.

This chapter does not apply to a reservation that meets any of the following criteria:

(a) The reservation was made for a negotiated rate that was not advertised, or otherwise made available, for booking by the general public.

(b) The reservation is for a hotel accommodation or short-term rental reservation that was confirmed before July 1, 2024.

(c) The reservation is one in which the specific hotel or short-term rental is not disclosed to the consumer until after the booking is confirmed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 718, Sec. 3.   (SB 644)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.4. LAYAWAY PRACTICES [1749. - 1749.4.]

1749.

Any retail seller which permits consumers to lay away consumer goods shall provide to any consumer entering into a layaway agreement with the seller a written statement of the terms and conditions of the agreement, including the following information:

(1) The amount of the deposit received.

(2) The length of time the goods will be held on layaway which may be expressed as a period of time or as a date when final payment for the goods is due.

(3) A specific description of the
 goods.

(4) The total purchase price of the goods including a separate listing of any handling or processing charges.

(5) Any other terms and conditions of the layaway agreement.

(6) That the seller will refund any layaway deposit and subsequent payments, if any, when, before the end of the stated layaway period, the goods have for any reason become no longer available in the same condition as at the time of the sale to the consumer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 825.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.1.

For purposes of this title, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Consumer good” means any article which is used or bought for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(b) “Retail seller” means an individual, firm, partnership, corporation, joint stock company, association, organization, or other legal entity which engages in the business of selling consumer goods to retail buyers.

(c) “Layaway” means an agreement by a retail seller with a consumer
 to retain specified consumer goods for sale to the consumer at a specified price, in earnest of which sale the consumer has deposited with the retail seller an agreed upon sum of money, and any other terms and conditions not contrary to law which are mutually agreed upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 825.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.2.

Any waiver by the buyer of consumer goods of the provisions of this title, except as expressly provided in this title, shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be unenforceable and void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 825.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.3.

The remedies provided by this title are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting any remedy that is otherwise available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 825.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.4.

Nothing in this title shall be construed to limit or reduce any legal obligations imposed under Title 2 (commencing with Section 1801) of Part 4 of Division 3 or under any other applicable law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 825.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.4A. GIFT CERTIFICATES [1749.45. - 1749.6.]

1749.45.

(a) As used in this title, “gift certificate” includes gift cards and electronic gift cards, but does not include any gift card usable with multiple sellers of goods or services, provided the expiration date, if any, is printed on the card. This exemption does not apply to a gift card usable only with affiliated sellers of goods or services.

(b) Nothing in this title prohibits those fees or practices expressly permitted by Section 17538.9 of the Business and Professions Code with respect to a prepaid calling card, as defined in that section, that is issued solely to provide an access number and authorization code for prepaid calling services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 207, Sec. 1.   (SB 22)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.5.

(a) It is unlawful for any person or entity to sell a gift certificate to a purchaser that contains any of the following:

(1) An expiration date.

(2) A service fee, including, but not limited to, a service fee for dormancy, except as provided in subdivision (f).

(b) (1) A gift certificate sold after January 1, 1997, is redeemable in cash for its cash value or subject to replacement with a new gift certificate at no cost to the purchaser or holder.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a gift certificate with a cash value of less
 than fifteen dollars ($15) is redeemable in cash for its cash value.

(c) Paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall not apply to a gift certificate that is donated to a nonprofit or a charitable organization without any money or other thing of value being given in exchange if the gift certificate has a disclaimer in at least 10-point font that the card is not redeemable for cash under California state law.

(d) A gift certificate sold without an expiration date is valid until redeemed or replaced.

(e) This section does not apply to any of the following gift certificates issued on or after January 1, 1998, if the expiration date appears in capital letters in at least 10-point font on the front of the gift certificate:

(1) A gift certificate that is
 distributed by the issuer to a consumer pursuant to an awards, loyalty, or promotional program without any money or other thing of value being given in exchange for the gift certificate by the consumer.

(2) A gift certificate that is donated or sold below face value at a volume discount to an employer or to a nonprofit or a charitable organization for fundraising purposes if the expiration date on that gift certificate is not more than 30 days after the date of sale.

(3) A gift certificate that is issued for perishable food products.

(f) Paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) does not apply to a dormancy fee on a gift card that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The remaining value of the gift card is five dollars ($5) or less each time the fee is
 assessed.

(2) The fee does not exceed one dollar ($1) per month.

(3) There has been no activity on the gift card for 24 consecutive months, including, but not limited to, purchases, the adding of value, or balance inquiries.

(4) The holder may reload or add value to the gift card.

(5) A statement is printed on the gift card in at least 10-point font stating the amount of the fee, how often the fee will occur, that the fee is triggered by inactivity of the gift card, and at what point the fee will be charged. The statement may appear on the front or back of the gift card, but shall appear in a location where it is visible to any purchaser prior to the purchase thereof.

(g) An issuer of gift
 certificates may accept funds from one or more contributors toward the purchase of a gift certificate intended to be a gift for a recipient if each contributor is provided with a full refund of the amount that the contributor paid toward the purchase of the gift certificate upon the occurrence of all of the following:

(1) The funds are contributed for the purpose of being redeemed by the recipient by purchasing a gift certificate.

(2) The time in which the recipient may redeem the funds by purchasing a gift certificate is clearly disclosed in writing to the contributors and the recipient.

(3) The recipient does not redeem the funds within the time described in paragraph (2).

(h) The prohibition described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), and the
 exemption from that prohibition described in subdivision (f), shall apply only to gift certificates issued on or after January 1, 2004.

(i) For purposes of this section, “cash” includes, but is not limited to, currency or check. If accepted by both parties, an electronic funds transfer or an application of the balance to a subscriber’s wireless telecommunications account is permissible.

(j) This section shall become operative on April 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 207, Sec. 3.   (SB 22)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative April 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.51.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.6.

(a) A gift certificate constitutes value held in trust by the issuer of the gift certificate on behalf of the beneficiary of the gift certificate. The value represented by the gift certificate belongs to the beneficiary, or to the legal representative of the beneficiary to the extent provided by law, and not to the issuer.

(b) An issuer of a gift certificate who is in bankruptcy shall continue to honor a gift certificate issued prior to the date of the bankruptcy filing on the
 grounds that the value of the gift certificate constitutes trust property of the beneficiary.

(c) (1) This section does not alter the terms of a gift certificate. The terms of a gift certificate may not make its redemption or other use invalid in the event of a bankruptcy.

(2) This section does not require, unless otherwise required by law, the issuer of a gift certificate to:

(A) Redeem a gift certificate for cash.

(B) Replace a gift certificate that has been lost or stolen.

(C) Maintain a separate account for the funds used to purchase the gift certificate.

(d) (1) This section
 does not create an interest in favor of the beneficiary of the gift certificate in any specific property of the issuer.

(2) This section does not create a fiduciary or quasi-fiduciary relationship between the beneficiary of the gift certificates and the issuer, unless otherwise provided by law.

(3) The issuer of a gift certificate has no obligation to pay interest on the value of the gift certificate held in trust under this section, unless otherwise provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 997, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.4B. SUPERMARKET CLUB CARDS [1749.60. - 1749.66.]

1749.60.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the “Supermarket Club Card Disclosure Act of 1999.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, pursuant to Sec. 2 of Ch. 586.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.61.

For purposes of this title:

(a) “Cardholder” means any consumer to whom a supermarket club card is issued, provided that in cases where more than one supermarket club card has been issued for the same account, all persons holding those supermarket club cards may be treated as a single cardholder.

(b) “Supermarket” means any retailer that sells food items.

(c) “Supermarket club card” means any card, plate, coupon book, or other single device existing for the purpose of being used from time to time upon presentation for price discounts on retail products offered by the club card issuer. “Supermarket club card” does not include any credit card that is subject to Section 1748.12.

(d) “Club card issuer” means a supermarket that provides supermarket club cards to consumers, and includes a supermarket’s contract information services provider.

(e) “Marketing information” means the categorization of cardholders compiled by a club card issuer, based on a cardholder’s shopping patterns, spending history, or behavioral characteristics derived from account activity which is provided to any person or entity for consideration. “Marketing information” does not include aggregate data which does not identify a cardholder based on the
 cardholder’s shopping patterns, spending history, or behavioral characteristics derived from account activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, pursuant to Sec. 2 of Ch. 586.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.63.

A violation of this title constitutes “unfair competition” as defined in Section 17200 of the Business and Professions Code and is punishable as prescribed in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, pursuant to Sec. 2 of Ch. 586.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.64.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no club card issuer shall request in a supermarket club card application, or require as a condition of obtaining a supermarket club card, that an applicant provide a driver’s license number or a social security account number. This section shall not be construed to prohibit a club card issuer from requesting a driver’s license number or a social security account number for a supermarket club card that can also be used as identification for check cashing purposes or to debit the checking or
 savings account of the cardholder. However, no club card issuer shall, as a condition of obtaining a supermarket club card, require a cardholder to obtain a supermarket club card that can also be used as identification for check cashing purposes or to debit the checking or savings account of the cardholder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, pursuant to Sec. 2 of Ch. 586.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.65.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no club card issuer may sell or share a cardholder’s name, address, telephone number, or other personal identification information.

(b) Nothing in this section is intended to prevent a club card issuer from providing names and addresses of cardholders to a third party for purposes of mailing supermarket club card information to cardholders on behalf of the club card issuer. However, that third party
 shall not use the information for any other purpose.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section does not prohibit a club card issuer from sharing marketing information that includes cardholder names and addresses if the club card issuer complies with all of the following:

(1) The club card issuer charges an annual fee for its supermarket club card.

(2) The club card issuer requires cardholders to renew supermarket club cards annually and to pay an annual renewal fee.

(3) The club card issuer allows only cardholders, and not members of the public, to make purchases in the supermarket.

(4) The club card issuer provides a privacy statement to the cardholder in the supermarket club card
 application and in the club card issuer’s annual renewal material notifying cardholders that outside companies will be receiving marketing information including names and addresses of cardholders, and the cardholder has agreed to allow the club card issuer to share this information.

(5) Prior to selling or transferring names and addresses of cardholders to an outside company, the club card issuer has obtained a written confidentiality agreement from the outside company that the outside company will not sell or share the information with any other entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, pursuant to Sec. 2 of Ch. 586.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.66.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.4C. Clarity of Marketplace Terms and Conditions and Dispute Resolution Minimum Fairness [1749.7. - 1749.7.]

1749.7.

(a) Every marketplace shall ensure that their terms and conditions regarding commercial relationships with marketplace sellers meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Are drafted in plain and intelligible language.

(2) Are easily available online for marketplace sellers at all stages of their commercial relationship with the marketplace, including, but not limited to, during the stage prior to the formation of a contract.

(3) Set out the grounds for decisions to retain, or refuse to disburse, funds in its possession belonging to a marketplace
 seller pending investigation or resolution of a dispute between the marketplace and the marketplace seller and the grounds for suspending or terminating a marketplace seller from participating in the marketplace.

(b) If a marketplace permits
 a marketplace seller to pay the marketplace to influence search results through ranking or preferential placement within the marketplace of tangible personal property or services sold by marketplace sellers through the marketplace, the marketplace, in its terms and conditions or policies, shall describe those possibilities and
 the effects of
 such payment on the ranking or preferential placement, and either (1) the price of that ranking or preferential placement or (2) how a marketplace seller may obtain written price information for such ranking or preferential placement.

(c) If a marketplace decides to suspend or
 terminate a marketplace seller based upon an alleged violation of law or a term, condition, or policy of the marketplace, the marketplace shall provide the marketplace seller, without undue delay, with a written statement of reasons for that decision. The written statement of reasons shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:

(1) Without disclosing information that would result in the disclosure of any proprietary, confidential, or trade secret information, or disclosing information that would hinder any investigation or prevention of deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, describe the facts and circumstances that led to the decision unless the marketplace reasonably believes that giving a written statement of reasons could negatively impact the safety or property of another user or the marketplace itself.

(2) Identify the term, condition, or policy that serves as the basis for the suspension or termination.

(3) Explain whether or not the decision may be appealed, and, if so, the procedure for such an appeal.

(d) For purposes of this section,
 the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Marketplace” means a physical or electronic place, including, but not limited to, a store, booth, internet website, catalog, television or radio broadcast, or a dedicated sales software application, that sells or offers for retail
 sale services or tangible personal property for delivery in this state and has an agreement with a marketplace seller to make retail sales of services or tangible personal property through that marketplace, regardless of whether the tangible personal property or the marketplace has a physical presence in the state. 

(2) “Marketplace seller” means a person residing in the state who has an agreement with a marketplace and makes retail sales of services or tangible personal property through a marketplace owned, operated, or controlled by that marketplace.

(3) “Ranking” means the relative prominence given to the
 tangible personal property or services offered to consumers through a marketplace, as organized or communicated to those consumers by the marketplace, irrespective of the technological means used for that organization or communication.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 635, Sec. 1.   (AB 1790)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.4D. Online Marketplaces [1749.8. - 1749.8.9.]

1749.8.

For purposes of this title:

(a) “Consumer product” means tangible personal property that is distributed in commerce and normally used for personal, family, or household purposes, including property intended to be attached to or installed in real property regardless of whether it is actually attached or installed.

(b) “High-volume third-party seller” means a third-party seller on an online marketplace who, in any continuous 12-month period during the previous 24 months, has entered into 200 or more discrete transactions utilizing the online marketplace for the sale of new or unused consumer products to buyers located in California resulting in the accumulation of an aggregate total of five thousand
 dollars ($5,000) or more in gross revenues.

(c) “Online marketplace” means a consumer-directed, electronically accessed platform that includes features that allow for, facilitate, or enable a third-party seller to engage in the sale, purchase, payment, storage, shipment, or delivery of a consumer product in this state.

(d) “Third-party seller” means a person or entity, independent of an online marketplace, who sells, offers to sell, or contracts with an online marketplace to sell a consumer product in the state by utilizing an online marketplace.

(e) “Verify” means to confirm that information provided to an online marketplace pursuant to this title is accurate. Methods of confirmation include the use of one or more methods that enable the online marketplace to reliably determine that the information and documents are
 valid, correspond to the seller or an individual acting on the seller’s behalf, are not misappropriated, and are not falsified.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 172, Sec. 3.   (SB 1144)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.8.1.

(a) An online marketplace shall require each high-volume third-party seller on the online marketplace to provide, not later than 10 days after qualifying as a high-volume third-party seller, all of the following information to the online marketplace:

(1) (A) A bank account number, or, if the high-volume third-party seller does not have a bank account, the name of the payee for payments issued by the online marketplace to the seller.

(B) The high-volume third-party seller shall provide the information required by this paragraph to one of the following as specified by the online marketplace:

(i) The online
 marketplace.

(ii) A payment processor or other third party designated by the online marketplace that is required, pursuant to a contract with the online marketplace, to maintain the information in a confidential manner and disclose the information only in response to a court order or to the online marketplace upon its request.

(2) If the high-volume third-party seller is an individual, the individual’s name.

(3) If the high-volume third-party seller is not an individual, one of the following:

(A) A copy of a valid government-issued identification for an individual who has the legal authority to act on behalf of the high-volume third-party seller that includes the individual’s name.

(B) A
 copy of a valid government record or tax document dated within the past 24 months that includes the business name and physical address of the high-volume third-party seller.

(4) A business tax identification number, or, if the high-volume third-party seller does not have a business tax identification number, a taxpayer identification number.

(5) A valid email address and telephone number for the high-volume third-party seller.

(b) An online marketplace shall verify the information provided pursuant to subdivision (a) within 10 days and shall verify within 10 days any changes to the information that is provided to the marketplace by a high-volume third-party seller. If a high-volume third-party seller provides a copy of a valid government-issued tax document, information contained within the tax document shall be
 presumed to be verified as of the date of issuance of the record or document.

(c) (1) The online marketplace shall, on at least an annual basis, notify each high-volume third-party seller operating on the online marketplace of the requirement to inform the online marketplace of any changes to the information provided by the seller pursuant to subdivision (a) within 10 days of receiving the notification and shall instruct each high-volume third-party seller, as part of the notification, to electronically certify that the information is accurate and that either that the seller’s information is unchanged or that the seller is providing updated information.

(2) If a high-volume third-party seller does not provide the information or certification required under this section, the online marketplace shall, after providing the seller with written or electronic notice
 and opportunity to provide the information or certification not later than 10 days after the issuance of the notice, suspend any future sales activity of the seller until the seller provides the information or certification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 11.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.8.2.

(a) An online marketplace shall require a high-volume third-party seller with at least twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) of gross annual revenues from transactions with buyers in California through the online
 marketplace in either of the two prior calendar years to
 provide, in addition to the information required by 1749.8.1, the following information to the online marketplace and to disclose the information about the high-volume third-party seller to consumers in a clear and conspicuous manner in the order confirmation message, or other communication made to a consumer after a purchase is finalized, and in the consumer’s account transaction history:

(1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the high-volume third-party seller shall provide all of the following identifying information:

(i) The
 full name of the
 high-volume third-party seller, which may include the seller’s name or company name, or the name by which the seller or company operates on the online marketplace.

(ii) The high-volume third-party seller’s physical address.

(iii) Contact information for the high-volume third-party seller, including a current working telephone number, email address,
 or any other means of direct electronic messaging, to allow users of the online marketplace to have direct and unhindered communication with the seller.

(B) A high-volume third-party seller may request that the online marketplace accept the following partial disclosures of information in lieu of the disclosures required pursuant to subparagraph (A):

(i) If the high-volume third-party seller certifies to the online marketplace that
 they do not have a physical address other
 than a residential physical address, or a combined business and residential physical address, the online marketplace may disclose only the country and state, if applicable, in which the seller resides and inform consumers that inquiries should be submitted to the seller by telephone, email, or electronic means provided by the online marketplace.

(ii) If the high-volume third-party seller certifies to the online marketplace that
 they do not have a telephone number other than a personal telephone number, the online marketplace shall inform consumers that no telephone number is available for the seller, and inquiries should be submitted to the seller’s email address or electronic means provided by the online marketplace.

(2) (A) Whether or not
 another party is responsible for supplying the product to the consumer upon purchase.

(B) If requested by an authenticated purchaser, the contact information described in paragraph (1) for the party who is responsible for supplying the product to the consumer upon purchase.

(b) An online marketplace shall disclose to consumers, in a clear and
 conspicuous manner on the product listing of a high-volume third-party seller, a reporting mechanism that allows for electronic and telephonic reporting of suspicious activity by the high-volume third-party seller to the online marketplace.

(c) (1) (A) An online marketplace shall suspend future sales activity of a high-volume third-party seller that
 meets any of the following criteria:

(i) The high-volume third-party seller is not in compliance with the requirements of this section.

(ii) The high-volume third-party seller made a false representation to the online marketplace about the applicability of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(iii) The high-volume third-party seller made a false representation to consumers.

(B) An online marketplace
 may suspend future sales activity of a high-volume third-party seller that has not answered consumer inquiries within a reasonable timeframe.

(2) (A) An online marketplace shall provide notice of an impending suspension pursuant to
 clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) and shall not suspend the high-volume third-party seller if the seller becomes in compliance with this section within 10 days of the date on which the notice was issued.

(B) If the high-volume third-party seller provides the information required by
 subdivision (a) more than 10 days after the date of the notice, the online marketplace shall restore the ability of the seller to have transactions facilitated by or through the online marketplace within 10 days of receiving all of the information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 857, Sec. 1.   (SB 301)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 1749.8.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.8.3.

(a) (1) An online marketplace shall keep the information provided to comply with the requirements of this title for no less than two years.

(2) Information provided solely to comply with the requirements of this title shall not be used for any other purpose unless required by law.

(3) An online marketplace shall implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices, including administrative, physical, and technical safeguards, appropriate to the nature of the information and the purposes for which the information will be used, to protect the information provided to comply
 with the requirements of this title from unauthorized use,
 disclosure, access, destruction, and modification.

(b) A high-volume third-party seller may redact from a document provided solely to comply with a requirement of this title any information that is not necessary for either of the following:

(1) To comply with a requirement of this title.

(2) To verify the authenticity of the document as a copy of a valid government-issued identification, government record, or tax document, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 857, Sec. 1.   (SB 301)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 1749.8.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.8.4.

(a) A person or entity who violates any provision of this title shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation, which may be assessed and recovered only in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General, a district attorney in any county, a city attorney in any city or city and county, or a county counsel in any county.

(b) In addition to the civil penalty provided by subdivision (a), the Attorney General, a district attorney, a city attorney in any city or city and county, or county counsel who prevails in an action to enforce this title shall be entitled to the following relief:

(1) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, including expert witness fees and other litigation expenses.

(2) Preventive relief, including a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order against any person responsible for the conduct.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 172, Sec. 5.   (SB 1144)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.8.5.

(a) This title does not apply to or affect the liability of an entity, including an entity that meets the definition of a high-volume third-party seller under this title, for damages caused by a consumer product that is sold online.

(b) This title shall become operative July 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 857, Sec. 1.   (SB 301)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1749.8.9.

(a) An online marketplace shall alert local, regional, or state law enforcement agencies in California if it knows or should know that a third-party seller is selling or attempting to sell stolen goods to a California resident, unless the online marketplace has received a notice from the law enforcement agency that the same third-party seller is suspected of selling or attempting to sell the same stolen goods on the online marketplace to a California resident.

(b) (1) An online marketplace shall do all of the following:

(A) Establish and maintain a policy prohibiting the sale of stolen goods on the online marketplace, which shall include consequences for knowingly selling stolen goods on the online marketplace, including, but not limited to, suspension or termination of the seller’s account.

(B) Provide a mechanism on the online marketplace that allows any individual to notify the online marketplace that a seller is or may be selling stolen goods.

(C) Provide a mechanism on the online marketplace that allows the online marketplace and law enforcement to communicate in a timely and confidential manner, including by means of a link to a dedicated
 web page, online portal, or point of contact and ensure timely replies to law enforcement requests, including warrants, subpoenas, and other legal processes.

(D) Maintain internal written policies, systems, and staff to monitor listings in order to affirmatively prevent and detect organized retail crime.

(2) The policy and mechanism required by this subdivision shall be publicly posted and readily accessible to users.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 172, Sec. 6.   (SB 1144)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.5. CONSUMERS LEGAL REMEDIES ACT [1750. - 1784.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [1750. - 1756.]

1750.

This title may be cited as the Consumers Legal Remedies Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1550.)
-------------------------------------------

1751.

Any waiver by a consumer of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy and shall be unenforceable and void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1550.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.

The provisions of this title are not exclusive. The remedies provided herein for violation of any section of this title or for conduct proscribed by any section of this title shall be in addition to any other procedures or remedies for any violation or conduct provided for in any other law.

Nothing in this title shall limit any other statutory or any common law rights of the Attorney General or any other person to bring class actions. Class actions by consumers brought under the specific provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1770) of this title shall be governed exclusively by the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing